Utah statutes.
26-38-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Place of public access" means any enclosed indoor place of business,
commerce, banking, financial service, or other service-related activity,
whether publicly or privately owned and whether operated for profit or not, to
which persons not employed at the place of public access have general and
regular access or which the public uses, including:
(a)  buildings, offices, shops, elevators, or restrooms;
(b)  means of transportation or common carrier waiting rooms;
(c)  restaurants, cafes, or cafeterias;
(d)  taverns as defined in Section 32A-1-105, or cabarets;
(e)  shopping malls, retail stores, grocery stores, or arcades;
(f)  libraries, theaters, concert halls, museums, art galleries, planetariums,
historical sites, auditoriums, or arenas;
(g)  barber shops, hair salons, or laundromats;
(h)  sports or fitness facilities;
(i)  common areas of nursing homes, hospitals, resorts, hotels, motels, "bed
and breakfast" lodging facilities, and other similar lodging facilities,
including the lobbies, hallways, elevators, restaurants, cafeterias, other
designated dining areas, and restrooms of any of these;
(j) (i)  any child care facility or program subject to licensure or
certification under this title, including those operated in private homes,
when any child cared for under that license is present; and
(ii)  any child care, other than child care as defined in Section 26-39-102,
that is not subject to licensure or certification under this title, when any
child cared for by the provider, other than the child of the provider, is
present;
(k)  public or private elementary or secondary school buildings and
educational facilities or the property on which those facilities are located;
(l)  any building owned, rented, leased, or otherwise operated by a social,
fraternal, or religious organization when used solely by the organization
members or their guests or families;
(m)  any facility rented or leased for private functions from which the
general public is excluded and arrangements for the function are under the
control of the function sponsor;
(n)  any workplace that is not a place of public access or a publicly owned
building or office but has one or more employees who are not owner-operators
of the business;
(o)  any area where the proprietor or manager of the area has posted a
conspicuous sign stating "no smoking", "thank you for not smoking", or similar
statement; and
(p) a club licensee under Title 32A, Chapter 5, Club Licenses.
(2)  "Publicly owned building or office" means any enclosed indoor place or
portion of a place owned, leased, or rented by any state, county, or municipal
government, or by any agency supported by appropriation of, or by contracts or
grants from, funds derived from the collection of federal, state, county, or
municipal taxes.
(3)  "Smoking" means the possession of any lighted tobacco product in any
form.
